Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DISMANTLERS
SECTION 1.  ORS 822.140 is amended to read:
822.140. (1) To meet the requirement for local  government approval of a dismantler certificate
under ORS 822.110 or a supplemental certificate under ORS 822.125, an  applicant must comply with
any regulations established by a city or county  under this section and must obtain the approval of
the governing body of the:
(a) City, if the business is or will be carried on within an  incorporated city of less than 100,000
population.
(b) County, if the business is or will be carried on outside of any incorporated city.
(2) A city or county governing body shall grant approval of a  dismantler certificate  [ or
renewal] or a supplemental certificate  when requested under this section if the governing body:
(a) Approves the applicant as  being suitable to establish, maintain or operate a motor vehicle
dismantling business;
(b) Determines that  the location or proposed location meets the requirements for location under
ORS 822.110;
(c) Determines that the location does not violate any prohibition under ORS 822.135; and
(d) Approves the location and determines that the  location complies with any regulations
adopted by a city or county under this section.
(3) The governing body of  a city or county may regulate the expansion of premises or the es-
tablishment of premises at a new location under a dismantler certificate. An  applicant must comply
with the regulations before the Department of Transportation  may issue a supplemental dismantler
certificate. In adopting regulations under this subsection, a governing body:
(a) Shall consider the extent of development of surrounding property as a residential area;
(b) Shall consider the proximity of churches, schools, hospitals, public buildings or other places
of public gathering;
(c) Shall consider the sufficiency in number of other motor vehicle dismantling businesses  in the
vicinity;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1544 (SB 1544-B) Page 1
(d) Shall consider the health, safety and general welfare of the public;
(e) May establish zones in which motor vehicle dismantling businesses  are permissible and other
zones where they are prohibited; and
(f) May  prescribe limitations on the dimensions of the premises on which motor vehicle dis-
mantling businesses are conducted.
(4) Regulations of a city governing body that are adopted under this section apply to motor  ve-
hicle dismantling businesses located outside of and within six miles of  the boundaries of the city
unless the county governing body in which the  area is located has adopted regulations under this
section that are applicable in the area.
(5) Before granting approval for a supplemental dismantler certificate, the governing  body of a
city or county shall notify all property owners that are or that  will be adjacent to the motor vehicle
dismantling business once the business moves, expands or opens an additional place of business.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 822.125 is amended to read:
822.125. (1) The holder of a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 is not
subject to the prohibitions  and penalties under ORS 822.100 as long as the holder’s motor vehicle
dismantling business is conducted in the location approved under the certificate.
(2) The  holder of a dismantler certificate may expand the dimensions or move a place of business
approved under the  dismantler certificate or open an additional place of business under the certif-
icate upon issuance of a supplemental  dismantler certificate by the Department of Transportation.
The following apply to supplemental certificates issued under this subsection:
(a) The department shall grant a supplemental certificate upon request  of an applicant under
this subsection if the  applicant obtains local government permission for the supplemental certificate
under ORS 822.140.
[(b) Upon application for renewal of the supplemental certificate, the  department may waive the
requirement that an applicant for renewal under this  subsection obtain local government approval un-
der ORS 822.140 of the suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain or  operate a motor vehicle
dismantling business.]
[(c)] (b) A fee shall be charged for a supplemental dismantler certificate under ORS 822.700.
(3) A dismantler certificate is valid for a two-year period  and may be renewed as provided by
the department. The department shall only renew the certificate of any certificate  holder who does
all of the following:
(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700.
(b) Completes the application described in ORS 822.115.
[(c) Obtains  local government approval under ORS 822.140. The department may waive the re-
quirement that an applicant for renewal  obtain local government approval under ORS 822.140 of the
suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain or operate a motor vehicle dismantling business. ]
[(d)] (c)  Maintains a current bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.120.
(4) The department may provide the holder of a dismantler  certificate with identification cards
in the names of the  owners of the business or in the names of authorized employees of the business.
(5) The department may adopt suitable rules for the issuance and renewal of dismantler certif-
icates and identification cards.
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION PROVIDERS
SECTION 3.
 ORS 184.752 is amended to read:
184.752. As used in ORS 184.752 to 184.766:
(1) “Public transportation service provider” includes  a qualified entity and a city, county, spe-
cial district, intergovernmental entity or any other political subdivision  or municipal or public cor-
poration  that  provides public transportation services and is not otherwise described in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) “Qualified entity” means the following:
(a)(A) Counties in which no part of a mass transit district or transportation district exists; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1544 (SB 1544-B) Page 2
(B) Intergovernmental entities who  are providing public transportation services on behalf
of a county;
(b) Mass transit districts organized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394;
(c) Transportation districts organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650; and
(d)(A) Federally recognized Indian tribes ; or
(B) Intergovernmental entities who  are providing public transportation services on behalf
of a tribe .
CAPTIONS
SECTION 4.
The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1544 (SB 1544-B) Page 3